Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.51, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Income property assessment data. The following data collected by political subdivisions and the state from individuals or business entities concerning income properties are classified as private or nonpublic data pursuant to section 13.02, subdivisions 9 and 12: (a) deleted text begin detaileddeleted text end income and expense figures; (b) deleted text begin averagedeleted text end vacancy deleted text begin factorsdeleted text end new text begin ratesnew text end ; deleted text begin (c) verified net rentable areas or net usable areas, whichever is appropriate; deleted text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end anticipated income and expenses; deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end projected vacancy deleted text begin factorsdeleted text end new text begin ratesnew text end ; and deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end lease information. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.51, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Request for legal discovery of income property assessment data. deleted text begin Upon request by a party to a responsible authority or designee for legal discovery of income property assessment data, as defined in subdivision 2, the requesting party shall notify the owner of record of the property. deleted text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding section 13.03, subdivision 6, a responsible authority or designee must not deny a request for legal discovery of income property assessment data classified by subdivision 2 that is made by a party in a legal proceeding on the grounds that the data is classified as private or nonpublic data. new text end new text begin (b) Subject to a protective order or other order issued by the court in the underlying legal proceeding, a party receiving access to income property assessment data under paragraph (a), as well as any person directly involved in the legal proceeding through which the data was requested who properly receives income property assessment data from that party, must not: new text end new text begin (1) use the data for any purpose unrelated to the legal proceeding; or new text end new text begin (2) disseminate the data to a person not directly involved in the legal proceeding. new text end new text begin (c) A party in a Tax Court proceeding must not use, file, offer, or move to admit into evidence any income property assessment data classified by subdivision 2 unless the Tax Court first issues a protective order protecting the data from public disclosure, dissemination, access, and use. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 271.06, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Hearings; new text begin protective orders required; new text end determination of issues; default. (a) The Tax Court shall hear, consider, and determine without a jury every appeal de novo. A Tax Court judge may empanel an advisory jury upon the judge's motion. The Tax Court shall hold a public hearing in every case.new text begin The Tax Court must issue protective orders to protect private or nonpublic income property assessment data classified by section 13.51, subdivision 2, from public disclosure, dissemination, access, and use, and may review the data at issue in camera.new text end All such parties shall have an opportunity to offer evidence and arguments at the hearing; provided, that the order of the commissioner or the appropriate unit of government in every case shall be prima facie valid. When an appeal to the Tax Court has been taken from an order or determination of the commissioner or from the appropriate unit of government, the proceeding shall be an original proceeding in the nature of a suit to set aside or modify the order or determination. In case no appellant shall appear the Tax Court shall enter its order affirming the order of the commissioner of revenue or the appropriate unit of government from which the appeal was taken. If the Department of Revenue's sales ratio study is introduced in Tax Court as evidence, the sales ratio data from the study shall be admissible as evidence only as provided in section 278.05, subdivision 4. (b) The commissioner, the taxpayer, and any other party to an appeal to the Tax Court may file all necessary notices, documents, and other necessary information with the Tax Court in a manner approved by the Tax Court. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 278.05, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Assessor's records; new text begin protective orders required; new text end evidence. new text begin (a) new text end Assessor's recordsdeleted text begin , including certificates of real estate value, assessor's field cards and property appraisal cardsdeleted text end shall be made available to the petitioner for inspection and copying and may be offered at the trial subject to the applicable rules of evidence and rules governing pretrial discovery deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin . Assessor's recordsnew text end shall not be excluded from discovery or admissible evidence on the grounds that the documents and the information recorded thereon are confidential or classified as private data on individualsnew text begin or nonpublic data by section 13.51, subdivision 2new text end . Evidence of comparable sales of other property shall, within the discretion of the court, be admitted at the trial. new text begin (b) The Tax Court must issue protective orders as required under section 271.06, subdivision 6. new text end new text begin (c) For purposes of this subdivision, "assessor's records" includes certificates of real estate value, assessor's field cards and property appraisal cards, and any other data classified by section 13.51, subdivision 2, regardless of whether the data: new text end new text begin (1) relates to the property that is the subject of the property tax petition; or new text end new text begin (2) is located within the assessor's file for the property that is the subject of the property tax petition. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 278.05, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Dismissal of petition; exclusion of certain evidence. (a) In cases where the petitioner contests the valuation of income-producing property, the following information must be provided to the county assessor no later than August 1 of the taxes payable year: (1) a year-end financial statement for the year prior to the assessment date; (2) a year-end financial statement for the year of the assessment date; (3) a rent roll on or near the assessment date listing the tenant name, lease start and end dates, base rent, square footage leased and vacant space; (4) identification of all lease agreements not disclosed on a rent roll in the response to clause (3), listing the tenant name, lease start and end dates, base rent, and square footage leased; (5) net rentable square footage of the building or buildings; and (6) anticipated income and expenses in the form of a proposed budget for the year subsequent to the year of the assessment date. (b) The information required to be provided to the county assessor under paragraph (a) does not include leases. deleted text begin Failure to provide the information required in paragraph (a)deleted text end new text begin If the assessor has notified the petitioner in writing of a deficiency in the information provided under paragraph (a), and the petitioner fails to correct the deficiency within 30 days of receiving the notification, the deficiencynew text end shall result in the dismissal of the petition, unless deleted text begin (1)deleted text end the failure to provide deleted text begin itdeleted text end new text begin the informationnew text end was due to the unavailability of the information at the time that the information was duedeleted text begin , or (2) the petitioner was not aware of or informed of the requirement to provide the informationdeleted text end . deleted text begin If the petitioner proves that the requirements under clause (2) are met, the petitioner has an additional 30 days to provide the information from the time the petitioner became aware of or was informed of the requirement to provide the information, otherwise the petition shall be dismissed. deleted text end (c) If, after the August 1 deadline set in paragraph (a), a county assessor determines that the actual leases in effect on the assessment date are necessary to properly evaluate the income-producing property, then a county assessor may require that the petitioner submit the leases. The petitioner must provide the requested information to the county assessor within 60 days of a county assessor's request. The Tax Court shall hear and decide any issues relating to subsequent information requests by a county assessor. Failure to provide the information required in this paragraph shall be addressed under Rules of Civil Procedure, rule 37. (d) Provided that the information as contained in paragraph (a) is timely submitted to the county assessor, the county assessor shall furnish the petitioner at least five days before the hearing under this chapter with the property's appraisal, if any, which will be presented to the court at the hearing. The petitioner shall furnish to the county assessor at least five days before the hearing under this chapter with the property's appraisal, if any, which will be presented to the court at the hearing. An appraisal of the petitioner's property done by or for the county shall not be admissible as evidence if the county assessor does not comply with the provisions in this paragraph. The petition shall be dismissed if the petitioner does not comply with the provisions in this paragraph.